Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.835

Domestic violence center of excellence—Plan.

(1) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the University of Washington shall develop a plan to establish a center of excellence in research, policy, and practice to reduce domestic violence.

(2) The plan must be developed with relevant disciplines across the schools of the University of Washington. The school of public health shall lead the development of the plan. The development of the plan must include, but not be limited to, the schools of social work, law, medicine, and nursing, and the Alene Moris women's center.

(3) The University of Washington must develop a report summarizing the plan, which must evaluate, but not be limited to, the following topics:

(a) Conducting scientifically rigorous intimate partner violence research that informs policy and practice in Washington;

(b) Disseminating existing research findings and best practices in order to proliferate evidence-based intimate partner violence policy and practice;

(c) Promoting effective strategies to reduce the incidence of domestic violence and domestic violence homicide; and

(d) Engaging in strategic planning efforts with relevant stakeholders to develop policy recommendations to improve the state's response to domestic violence.

(4) In developing the plan, the University of Washington shall establish an external stakeholder group that shall ensure that all work conducted by the center is informed by survivors of domestic violence, including Black, indigenous, and survivors of color, and LGBTQ survivors, to ensure that research interventions are holistic, trauma-informed, and antiracist and policy recommendations are appropriate and effective for Washington's diverse communities. The University of Washington shall include, but not be limited to, survivors of intimate partner violence, including low-income communities, immigrants, refugee communities, people with religious diversity, people with physical disabilities, children and other family members of survivors, representatives from systems that interact with survivors and perpetrators, and representatives from communities disproportionately impacted by intimate partner violence in order to guide development of the plan's overarching goals and strategic vision. The University of Washington shall provide stipends to stakeholder participants to the extent necessary to maximize participation.

(5) The University of Washington shall provide a report to the relevant committees of the legislature with its findings and recommendations as soon as practicable, but no later than January 15, 2024.

(6) Subject to funds appropriated for this specific purpose, the University of Washington shall begin implementation of the plan by July 1, 2024.

[ 2023 c 462 s 602.]